public_html/app/tools/spellchecker/dictionaries/vec.aff
# numerali - koletivi
# dict: pèr
SFX b Y 16
SFX b èxe    exena    dièxe
SFX b úndexe undexena úndexe
SFX b ódexe  odexena  dódexe
SFX b édexe  edexena  trédexe
SFX b òrdexe ordexena kuatòrdexe
SFX b índexe indexena kuíndexe
SFX b édexe  edexena  sédexe
SFX b ète    etena    sète
SFX b òto    otena    dòto
SFX b i      ena      vinti
SFX b énta   entena   trénta
SFX b a      ena      anta
SFX b o      enèr     [ŧx]ento
SFX b e      èr       mile
SFX b 0      èr       melion
SFX b o      èr       meliardo

# numerali - moltiplegativi
# dict: únego/B
# dict: úñolo/B
# dict: síngolo/B
# dict: sénplise
# dict: sinpio/B
# dict: sinplio/B
# dict: senpio/B
# dict: dopio/B
# dict: triplo/B
# dict: kuàdruplo/B
# dict: kuíntuplo/B
# dict: sèstuplo/B
# dict: sètuplo/B
# dict: òtuplo/B
# dict: nònuplo/B
# dict: dèkuplo/B
# dict: ŧéntuplo/B
# dict: milèkuplo/B

# numerali - fraŧionari
# dict: mèđo/B

# numeraŧion latina
# dict: i/£
# dict: v/£
# dict: x/£$
# dict: xx/£$
# dict: xxx/£$
# dict: l/£$
# dict: c/£$
# dict: d/£$
# dict: m/£$
SFX £ Y 10
SFX £ 0 i    [ivxlcdm]
SFX £ 0 ii   [ivxlcdm]
SFX £ 0 iii  [vxlcdm]
SFX £ 0 iv   [xlcdm]
SFX £ 0 v    [ixlcdm]
SFX £ 0 vi   [xlcdm]
SFX £ 0 vii  [xlcdm]
SFX £ 0 viii [xlcdm]
SFX £ 0 ix   [xlcdm]
SFX £ 0 x    i

PFX $ Y 62
PFX $ 0 x      [lc]
PFX $ 0 l      x
PFX $ 0 c      [xlcdm]
PFX $ 0 cx     [lc]
PFX $ 0 cl     x
PFX $ 0 cc     [xlc]
PFX $ 0 ccx    [lc]
PFX $ 0 ccl    x
PFX $ 0 ccc    [xl]
PFX $ 0 cccx   [lc]
PFX $ 0 cccl   x
PFX $ 0 cd     [xl]
PFX $ 0 cdx    [lc]
PFX $ 0 cdl    x
PFX $ 0 d      [xlc]
PFX $ 0 dx     [lc]
PFX $ 0 dl     x
PFX $ 0 dc     [xlc]
PFX $ 0 dcx    [lc]
PFX $ 0 dcl    x
PFX $ 0 dcc    [xlc]
PFX $ 0 dccx   [lc]
PFX $ 0 dccl   x
PFX $ 0 dccc   [xl]
PFX $ 0 dcccx  [lc]
PFX $ 0 dcccl  x
PFX $ 0 cm     [xl]
PFX $ 0 cmx    [lc]
PFX $ 0 cml    x
PFX $ 0 m      [xlcdm]
PFX $ 0 mx     [lc]
PFX $ 0 ml     x
PFX $ 0 mc     [xlcmd]
PFX $ 0 mcx    [lc]
PFX $ 0 mcl    x
PFX $ 0 mcc    [xlc]
PFX $ 0 mccx   [lc]
PFX $ 0 mccl   x
PFX $ 0 mccc   [xl]
PFX $ 0 mcccx  [lc]
PFX $ 0 mcccl  x
PFX $ 0 mcd    [xl]
PFX $ 0 mcdx   [lc]
PFX $ 0 mcdl   x
PFX $ 0 md     [xlc]
PFX $ 0 mdx    [lc]
PFX $ 0 mdl    x
PFX $ 0 mdc    [xlc]
PFX $ 0 mdcx   [lc]
PFX $ 0 mdcl   x
PFX $ 0 mdcc   [xlc]
PFX $ 0 mdccx  [lc]
PFX $ 0 mdccl  x
PFX $ 0 mdccc  [xl]
PFX $ 0 mdcccx [lc]
PFX $ 0 mdcccl x
PFX $ 0 mcm    [xl]
PFX $ 0 mcmx   [lc]
PFX $ 0 mcml   x
PFX $ 0 mm     [xlc]
PFX $ 0 mmx    [lc]
PFX $ 0 mml    x

# đorni de la setemana
# dict: Luni
# dict: Marti
# dict: Mèrkore
# dict: Mèrkol
# dict: Điòba
# dict: Đòbia
# dict: Đoba
# dict: Đobia
# dict: Vénare
# dict: Véndre
# dict: Véndri
# dict: Véner
# dict: Vénere
# dict: Sabo
# dict: Doménega

# mexi
# dict: Đenaro
# dict: Đanèr
# dict: Đenèr
# dict: Febraro
# dict: Fevraro
# dict: Fevrèr
# dict: Marŧo
# dict: Aprile
# dict: Avril
# dict: Mađo
# dict: Majo
# dict: Đuño
# dict: Junio
# dict: Lujo
# dict: Lulio
# dict: Agosto
# dict: Seténbre
# dict: Seténbare
# dict: Otóbre
# dict: Otóbare
# dict: Novénbre
# dict: Novénbare
# dict: Dexénbre
# dict: Dexénbare

# staxon (ant. saxon)
# dict: Primavera
# dict: Primaverta
# dict: Vèrta
# dict: Insuta
# dict: Ansuda
# dict: Istà
# dict: Autuno
# dict: Otuno
# dict: Fardima
# dict: Invèrno

# đonture koordenanti
# dict: né
# dict: néke
# dict: ní
# dict: ñanka
# dict: anka
# dict: oltre
# dict: pitòsto
# dict: altrimenti
# dict: ma
# dict: anŧi
# dict: inveŧe
# dict: defati
# dict: parké
# dict: parò
# dict: anpò
# dict: siben
# dict: donka
# dict: adonka
# dict: alora
# dict: insoma
# dict: kusí
# dict: kusíta
# dict: kuindi
# dict: sia
# dict: kome
# dict: fà
# dict: kofà
# dict: tanto/B

# đonture subordenanti
# dict: de
# dict: parkome
# dict: sikome
# dict: sí
# dict: almanko
# dict: finké
# dict: mentre
# dict: pena
# dict: intanto
# dict: kó
# dict: vanti
# dict: drio
# dict: man
# dict: kondiŧion
# dict: pato
# dict: basta
# dict: kaxo
# dict: kaxomài
# dict: nò
# dict: kuaxi
# dict: skuaxi
# dict: fora
# dict: via
# dict: senŧa
# dict: pitòsto

# esklamaŧion
# dict: ah
# dict: aah
# dict: eh
# dict: ehh
# dict: ih
# dict: oh
# dict: ohh
# dict: uh
# dict: ahi
# dict: ehi
# dict: ufa
# dict: òhu
# dict: òhi
# dict: ohi
# dict: ohe
# dict: ohé
# dict: ohu
# dict: bah
# dict: cò
# dict: mah
# dict: ehm
# dict: uhm
# dict: mh
# dict: ssh
# dict: ha
# dict: ho
# dict: òco
# dict: èko
# dict: brao
# dict: bravo
# dict: fòrŧa
# dict: korajo
# dict: ben
# dict: benon
# dict: basta
# dict: viva
# dict: a
# dict: pò
# dict: mò
# dict: vara
# dict: ‘ara
# dict: tarà
# dict: mostro
# dict: bèlo
# dict: mixèria
# dict: òro
# dict: viva
# dict: brr
# dict: malani
# dict: guài
# dict: fiol
# dict: fiòl
# dict: kan
# dict: magari
# dict: rivaderse
# dict: cao
# dict: sani
# dict: sanité
# dict: salve
# dict: pòro/B
# dict: mona
# dict: din
# dict: don
# dict: tik
# dict: tak
# dict: patapúnfete
# dict: pàfete
# dict: cik
# dict: cak
# dict: ñao
# dict: kikirikí




# TODO
# pàx. 119


#SFX Y N 12
#SFX Y o emente [lu]ento
#SFX Y o amente [^t]o
#SFX Y o amente [^n]to
#SFX Y o amente [^e]nto
#SFX Y o amente [^lu]ento
#SFX Y 0 mente  [^rln]e
#SFX Y e mente  [aeiou]re
#SFX Y 0 mente  [^aeiou]re
#SFX Y e mente  [^l]le
#SFX Y 0 mente  lle
#SFX Y e amente one
#SFX Y 0 mente  [^o]ne-
