public_html/app/tools/spellchecker/dictionaries/vec.dic
dièxe/b
dexe/b
vinti/b
trénta/b
kuaranta/b
ŧinkuanta/b
sesanta/b
setanta/b
otanta/b
novanta/b
ŧento/b
doxento/b
trexento/b
mile/b
melion/Sb
meliardo/Sb
i/£
v/£
x/£$
xx/£$
xxx/£$
l/£$
c/£$
d/£$
m/£$
